Arkansas, session 2025, HB1218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows:
CHAPTER 108 — THERAPEUTIC RECREATION SPECIALISTS

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

17-108-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Therapeutic
Recreation Practice Act".

17-108-102. Purpose.
The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the regulation of persons
offering therapeutic recreation services to the public in order to:
(1) Safeguard the public health, safety, and welfare;
(2) Protect the public from being misled by incompetent and
unauthorized persons; and
*JMB115*
03-04-2025 10:04:31 JMB115

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1218
(3) Ensure the highest degree of professional conduct on the
part of therapeutic recreation specialists and the availability of
therapeutic recreation services to persons in need of therapeutic recreation
services.

17-108-103. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)(A) "Therapeutic recreation" means the specialized
application of recreation to assist with the treatment or maintenance, or
both, of the health status, functional abilities, recreational and leisure
activities, and quality of life for individuals hospitalized or receiving
treatment, or both, for various diagnoses and individuals with disabilities.
(B) "Therapeutic recreation" includes without limitation:
(i) Remediating or restoring an individual’s
participation levels in recreational and leisure activities that are limited
due to impairment in physical, cognitive, social, or emotional abilities;
(ii) Analyzing and evaluating recreational
activities to determine the physical, social, and programmatic elements
necessary for involvement in recreational and leisure activities and
modifying the physical, social, and programmatic elements to promote full
participation and maximization of functional independence in recreational and
leisure activities;
(iii) Using recreational modalities in designed
intervention strategies to maximize physical, cognitive, social, or emotional
abilities to promote participation in recreational and leisure activities;
(iv) Conducting an individualized assessment to
collect systematic, comprehensive, and accurate data necessary to determine
the course of action and subsequent individualized treatment plan;
(v) Planning and developing an individualized
therapeutic recreation treatment plan that identifies an individual’s goals,
objectives, and potential treatment intervention strategies for recreational
and leisure activities;
(vi) Implementing an individualized therapeutic
recreation treatment plan that is consistent with an overall treatment
program;
(vii) Systematically evaluating and comparing an
03-04-2025 10:04:31 JMB115

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1218
individual’s response to his or her individualized therapeutic recreation
treatment plan and suggesting modifications as appropriate;
(viii) Developing a discharge plan in collaboration
with an individual, the individual’s family, the treatment team, and other
identified support networks where appropriate;
(ix) Identifying and training in the use of adaptive
recreational equipment;
(x) Identifying, providing, and educating
individuals to use recreational and leisure resources that support a healthy,
active, and engaged life;
(xi) Minimizing the impact of environmental
constraints as a barrier to participation in recreational and leisure
activities;
(xii) Collaborating with and educating an
individual, the individual’s family, the individual’s caregiver, and other
persons to foster an environment that is responsive to the recreational and
leisure needs of the individual; and
(xiii) Consulting with groups, programs,
organizations, or communities to improve physical, social, and programmatic
accessibility in recreational and leisure activities; and
(2) "Therapeutic recreation specialist" means a person licensed
to practice therapeutic recreation in this state.

17-108-104. Unlawful practice — Exemptions.
(a) A person shall not practice or hold himself or herself out as
being able to practice therapeutic recreation or provide therapeutic
recreation services in this state unless the person is licensed under this
chapter as a therapeutic recreation specialist.
(b) This chapter does not prevent or restrict the practice, services,
or activities of:
(1) A person of other licensed professions or personnel
supervised by licensed professions in this state from performing work
incidental to the practice of his or her profession or occupation, if that
person does not represent himself or herself as a therapeutic recreation
specialist;
(2) A person enrolled in a course of study leading to a degree
03-04-2025 10:04:31 JMB115

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1218
or certificate in therapeutic recreation from performing therapeutic
recreation services incidental to the person’s course work when supervised
by a licensed professional, if the person is designated by a title which
clearly indicates his or her status as a student;
(3) A person whose training and national certification attests
to the individual’s preparation and ability to practice his or her
profession, if that person does not represent himself or herself as a
therapeutic recreation specialist;
(4)(A) A therapeutic recreation assistant providing therapeutic
recreation services under the direct supervision of a therapeutic recreation
specialist licensed in this state.
(B) A therapeutic recreation assistant is not permitted to
conduct assessments or develop treatment plans;
(5) A person employed by a licensed or certified provider of
services for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities
that provides recreational activities as a part of his or her duties;
(6) A person providing recreational programs to an individual
with disabilities as a normal part of the leisure lifestyle of the individual
with disabilities, including supporting individuals with intellectual and
developmental disabilities in Special Olympics, Miracle League, and other
community activities;
(7)(A) A person employed by the United States Government while
in the discharge of his or her official duties.
(B) If a person under subdivision (b)(6)(A) of this
section engages in the practice of therapeutic recreation outside of his or
her official duties, the person is required to be licensed under this
chapter; and
(8) Any occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant
in the area of recreation and leisure.

17-108-105. Penalties.
(a) A person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter upon
conviction shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by
imprisonment for not more than six (6) months or by a fine not exceeding one
thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), or by both fine and imprisonment, at
the discretion of the court.
03-04-2025 10:04:31 JMB115

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1218
(b) It shall be the duty of the prosecuting attorney in the county
where the violation occurs, upon request by the Department of Health, to
initiate proper legal proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction to
enforce the provisions of this chapter.
(c) A person found guilty of a violation of this chapter may be
subject to emergency suspension or revocation of licensure dependent upon the
findings.
(d)(1) The courts of this state have jurisdiction and power to enjoin
the unlawful practice of therapeutic recreation and related techniques in a
proceeding by the department or by any citizen of this state in the county in
which the alleged unlawful practice occurred, the county in which the
defendant resides, or in Pulaski County.
(2) The issuance of an injunction does not relieve a person from
criminal prosecution for violation of this chapter, but the remedy of
injunction shall be in addition to liability to criminal prosecution.

17-108-106. Criminal background checks.
(a) An applicant applying for a therapeutic recreation specialist
license issued by the Department of Health shall apply to the Identification
Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police for a state and federal
criminal background check to be conducted by the Identification Bureau of the
Division of Arkansas State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(b) If an applicant has a conviction listed under § 17-3-102, the
department shall deny the application to be a therapeutic recreation
specialist or waive the disqualification under the procedures under § 17-3-
102.

17-108-107. Advertisement as therapeutic recreation specialist without
a license.
(a) A person shall not advertise in any manner or otherwise represent
himself or herself as a therapeutic recreation specialist or as a provider of
therapeutic recreation or recreation therapy services unless the person is
licensed under this chapter.
(b)(1) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.
(2) Upon conviction, the Department of Health, in consultation
with the Recreational Therapy Technical Advisory Committee, may:
03-04-2025 10:04:31 JMB115

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1218
(A) Revoke his or her license;
(B) Suspend his or her license for a period not to exceed
six (6) months from the date of the hearing; or
(C) Place restrictions on the person's license in the form
of probation as determined by the department.

Subchapter 2 — Recreational Therapy Technical Advisory Committee

17-108-201. Recreational Therapy Technical Advisory Committee —
Creation and membership.
(a) There is created the Recreational Therapy Technical Advisory
Committee within the Department of Health.
(b)(1) The committee shall consist of five (5) members, who shall be
appointed by the Secretary of the Department of Health, for a term of three
(3) years.
(2)(A) Three (3) members shall be therapeutic recreation
specialists under this chapter.
(B) Two (2) members, to represent the public, shall not be
engaged in or retired from the practice of therapeutic recreation.
(c)(1)(A) The initial professional members shall be appointed for
staggered terms of one (1) year, two (2) years, and three (3) years.
(B) The initial lay members shall be appointed for
staggered terms of one (1) year and two (2) years.
(2) The terms of each initial member shall expire July 1 of
the year of the end of his or her term regardless of the date of appointment.
(d) A vacancy shall be filled by the department in the same manner as
the original appointment.
(e)(1) The committee shall meet at least quarterly.
(2) At the initial meeting, the members shall elect a chair who
shall represent the committee at all meetings of the department.
(3) The Secretary of the Department of Health shall call the
first meeting of the committee.
(f) Three (3) members of the committee shall constitute a quorum for
the purpose of conducting official business of the committee.

17-108-202. Recreational Therapy Technical Advisory Committee — Powers
03-04-2025 10:04:31 JMB115

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1218
and duties.
The Recreational Therapy Technical Advisory Committee shall:
(1) Advise the Department of Health on all matters pertaining to
the licensure, education, and continuing education requirements for
therapeutic recreation specialists and the practice of therapeutic recreation
in this state; and
(2) Assist and advise the department in all hearings involving
therapeutic recreation specialists who are deemed to be in violation of this
chapter.

17-108-203. Department of Health — Powers and duties.
(a) The Department of Health shall:
(1) Determine, as recommended by the Recreational Therapy
Technical Advisory Committee, the qualifications of applicants for licensure
and determine which applicants successfully pass the required examinations
for licensure;
(2) Determine necessary fees to carry out this chapter;
(3) Make investigations and inspections to ensure compliance
with this chapter and the rules of the department;
(4) Conduct hearings as required under the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.;
(5) Report to the prosecuting attorney having jurisdiction or
the Attorney General an act committed by a person that may constitute a
misdemeanor under this chapter;
(6) Initiate prosecution and civil proceedings;
(7) Suspend, revoke, or deny the license of a therapeutic
recreation specialist for violation of this chapter or rules of the
department;
(8) Maintain a record listing the name of each therapeutic
recreation specialist licensed in this state;
(9)(A) Compile a list of therapeutic recreation specialists
licensed to practice in this state.
(B) The list shall be available to any person upon
application to the department and the payment of a fee as determined by
the department for the reasonable expense under this chapter; and
(10) Make expenditures and employ personnel for the
03-04-2025 10:04:31 JMB115

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1218
administration of this chapter.
(b) The department may promulgate the rules regarding the requirements
for licensure, standards for training, standards for institutions for
training, and standards of practice after licensure, including power of
revocation of a license to practice therapeutic recreation.

17-108-204. Employees.
(a) The Department of Health may employ an executive director, regular
or special counsel, inspectors, clerks, secretaries, and other personnel that
the department deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(b) An employee under this section shall not have any financial
interest in the practice or instruction of therapeutic recreation.

Subchapter 3 — Licensure

17-108-301. Qualifications of licensure.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the
Department of Health may issue a license to practice as a therapeutic
recreation specialist to an applicant who:
(1) Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(2) Has successfully completed an academic program with a
baccalaureate degree or higher from an accredited college or university with
a major in therapeutic recreation or a major in recreation or leisure
with an option or emphasis, or both, in therapeutic recreation;
(3) Has successfully completed a period of field experience
under the supervision of a therapeutic recreation specialist approved by the
educational institution where the applicant has met his or her academic
requirements;
(4) Has successfully completed the proctored examination
approved by the department; and
(5) Submits an application with a fee as determined by the
department.
(b) The department may grant initial licenses to a therapeutic
recreation specialist who is certified by the National Council for
Therapeutic Recreation Certification before July 1, 2015, and who holds an
active certified therapeutic recreation specialist credential issued by the
03-04-2025 10:04:31 JMB115

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1218
National Council for Therapeutic Recreation Certification.

17-108-302. Licensure without examination.
Upon proper application and payment of fees, the Department of Health
may issue a license without examination to a person who is licensed or
otherwise certified as a therapeutic recreation specialist by another state
or national certifying body which has substantially the same standards for
licensure as are required by this state under this chapter.

17-108-303. Temporary License.
(a) Upon proper application and payment of fees, the Department of
Health may issue a temporary license to a person who has applied for a
license under this chapter and who is eligible to take the examination under
this chapter.
(b) The temporary license shall:
(1) Be available to an applicant only for his or her first
application for licensure; and
(2) Expire upon notice that the applicant has or has not passed
the examination.

17-108-304. Renewals.
(a) All licenses under this chapter are valid for two (2) years from
the date of issuance.
(b) Upon receipt of a renewal application and renewal fees as
determined by the Department of Health, the department may renew a license as
a therapeutic recreation specialist if the person:
(1) Has completed a minimum of one hundred (100) hours of
experience performing therapeutic recreation services; and
(2) Has completed a minimum of twenty (20) hours of continuing
education related to the practice of therapeutic recreation and other
requirements established by rule of the department.
(c)(1) The department may, upon notice and opportunity for a hearing,
deny an application for renewal or reinstate a license with conditions.
(2) The conditions imposed upon a license under subdivision
(c)(1) of this section may include a requirement for continuing education,
practice under the supervision of a therapeutic recreation specialist, or any
03-04-2025 10:04:31 JMB115

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1218
other conditions deemed appropriate by the department.

17-108-305. Title and practice protection.
(a)(1) A person or entity shall not use or assume the title
“therapeutic recreation specialist”, "licensed therapeutic recreation
specialist", "certified therapeutic specialist" or the abbreviation "TRS",
"TRS/L", "CTRS", or "CTRS/L", or use any words, letters, abbreviations, or
insignia indicating or implying directly or indirectly that the person holds
a therapeutic recreation specialist license or is providing therapeutic
recreation services unless the person is licensed under this chapter.
(2) A person may only use the abbreviation "CTRS/L" if the
person maintains credentials with the National Council for Therapeutic
Recreation Certification.
(b) This section does not apply to a person who is providing
therapeutic recreation services under the direction of a therapeutic
recreation specialist licensed under this chapter.

17-108-306. Referrals.
(a) Consultation and evaluation by a therapeutic recreation specialist
may be performed without a referral.
(b) Initiation of therapeutic recreation services to individuals with
medically related conditions shall be based on a referral from a physician
who is either a medical doctor or a doctor of osteopathy.
(c) Prevention, wellness, education, adaptive sports, recreation, and
related services shall not require a referral.

17-108-307. Delegation of tasks.
(a) A person shall not coerce a therapeutic recreation specialist into
compromising client safety by requiring the therapeutic recreation specialist
to delegate activities or tasks if the therapeutic recreation specialist
determines that it is inappropriate to delegate a task.
(b) A therapeutic recreation specialist is not subject to disciplinary
action by the Department of Health for refusing to delegate activities or
tasks or refusing to provide the required training for delegation if the
therapeutic recreation specialist determines that the delegation may
compromise client safety.
03-04-2025 10:04:31 JMB115

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1218

17-108-308. Grounds for denial, revocation, or suspension.
The Department of Health may deny, revoke, suspend, place on probation,
or refuse to renew a license if the department finds that the individual or
licensee has:
(1) Been convicted of a felony listed under § 17-3-102; or
(2) Violated a rule of the department or any law regulating the
practice of therapeutic recreation.

/s/J. Mayberry


























03-04-2025 10:04:31 JMB115